Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 3 Public Buildings and Other Facilities
Subchapter 3

— Capitol Zoning District

Effective Dates.

Acts 1975, No. 267, § 13: Feb. 25, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that there is an urgent need to establish coordinated physical development in the Capitol area and to promote the uniform and appropriate regulation of this area. For the purpose of immediately developing a comprehensive master zoning plan the provisions of this act are necessary. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1223, § 21: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 262, § 5: Feb. 25, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the authority to hire the director and professional staff of the Capital Zoning District Commission is more germane to the Capital Zoning District Commission than Arkansas State Building Services; the present law vests that authority in State Building Services; that the efficient administration of government requires that the authority be transferred to the Capitol Zoning District Commission as soon as possible so that authority will be vested in the commission if necessary prior to the expiration of ninety (90) days after this regular session. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1350, § 48: July 1, 1997, except §§ 30, 31, 38, and 39, which became law without the Governor's signature. Noted Apr. 15, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-first General Assembly, that the appropriation and money provided in herein for the School for Mathematics and Sciences, College Station Community Center (Section 31) and the ability for the Department of Higher Eduacation to carry forward balances (Section 30) must be made available during the current fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, Sections 38 and 39 of this Act (Math and Science Supplemental Appropriation and Funding), Section 30 (Higher Education Carryforward) and Section 31 (College Station Community Center) shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, those sections shall become effective on the expiration date of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, those sections shall become effective on the date the last house override the veto. The remaining sections of this Act shall become effective from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2016, No. 228, § 7: July 1, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2016 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2016 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2016.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-3-301. Construction.

(a)

This subchapter shall be construed liberally. The enumeration of any object, purpose, method, manner, power, or thing shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, methods, manners, powers, or things.

(b)

This subchapter shall be the complete and sole authority for the accomplishment of the purpose of the subchapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 267, §§ 11, 12; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-244, 5-244n.

22-3-302. Purpose — Creation.

(a)

To promote the general welfare of the state with respect to the State Capitol and to promote the general welfare of the property owners of the area as described in this subchapter, an improvement and comprehensive community zoning district, to be called the “Capitol Zoning District”, is created, which district shall embrace all that portion of land situated in Little Rock, Pulaski County, State of Arkansas, within the following-described boundaries: Beginning at the point where the centerline of 10th Street intersects the eastern edge of the right-of-way of the Missouri Pacific and Rock Island Railroad Line, thence northeast along the southern boundary of that right-of-way to the point where the centerline of Cross Street, extended northeast, intersects that right-of-way, thence south along the centerline of Cross Street to the point where that line intersects the northern edge of the Wilbur Mills Freeway (I-630), surveyed by the Arkansas Department of Transportation, thence westward along the northern edge of the Wilbur Mills Freeway (I-630), as surveyed by the Arkansas Department of Transportation, to the point of the beginning.

(b)(1)

In addition to the area described in subsection (a) of this section, the Capitol Zoning District also shall include an area surrounding the Governor's Mansion, which is located at 18th and Center Streets in the City of Little Rock, Pulaski County, Arkansas, within the following-described boundaries: Beginning at a point on the southwestern corner of 13th and Cumberland Streets, in the City of Little Rock, Pulaski County, Arkansas, proceeding south along the western side of Cumberland Street to the northwest corner of 16th and Cumberland Streets, and then proceeding west along the northern boundary of 16th Street to a point where the centerline of the alleyway between Scott and Cumberland Streets, extended northward, intersects that northern boundary, thence, south along the centerline of the alleyway, or an imaginary line bisecting the blocks between Cumberland and Scott Streets, to the southern boundary of 22nd Street, and thence west along that southern boundary to a point where an imaginary line bisecting the block between Scott and Main Streets intersects that southern boundary, thence south along that imaginary line to a point where the centerline of Roosevelt Road extended eastward intersects that imaginary line, then west along the centerline of Roosevelt Road to the centerline of Chester Street, thence north along the centerline of Chester Street to the centerline of 20th Street, thence east along the centerline of 20th Street, to a point where the centerline of the alleyway between Gaines and State Streets intersects the centerline of 20th Street, thence north along the centerline of the alleyway, or an imaginary line bisecting the blocks between Gaines and State Streets, to a point where that centerline intersects the southern boundary of 13th Street, thence east along the southern boundary of 13th Street to the point of the beginning.

(2)

In addition, the Capitol Zoning District may in the future be further extended by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the Capitol Zoning District Commission to include the area in the following-described boundaries: Beginning at the centerline of Chester Street where it intersects with the centerline of 20th Street proceeding north along the centerline of Chester Street to I-630; thence east along the southern boundary of I-630 to the intersection of the centerline of Commerce Street; thence south along the centerline of Commerce Street to a point where it intersects the centerline of 24th Street; thence east along the centerline of 24th Street to I-30; thence south along the western boundary of I-30 to the intersection of the centerline of Roosevelt Road; and thence west along the centerline of Roosevelt Road to the point of intersection with the imaginary line that bisects the block between Scott and Main Streets.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 267, § 2; 1979, No. 917, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-236; Acts 2001, No. 1798, § 1; 2017, No. 707, §
79.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment, in (b)(1), substituted “also shall include,” for “shall also include,” substituted “Roosevelt Road” for “23rd Street,” inserted “to the centerline … of 20th Street,” and substituted “20th” for “23rd”; and added (b)(2) and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” twice in (a).

22-3-303. Capitol Zoning District Commission.

(a)

There is created and established at the seat of government a commission to be known as the “Capitol Zoning District Commission”.

(b)

The commission shall have nine (9) members, as follows:

(1)

The Governor, or his or her designee, who shall be chair;

(2)

The Secretary of State, or his or her designee;

(3)

Four (4) resident electors of this state, to be designated by the Governor and who shall serve three-year terms, one (1) of whom shall be a black;

(4)

The director of the city planning staff of the City of Little Rock, or his or her designee;

(5)

One (1) resident elector of this state who shall be a resident of and an owner of property within the Governor's Mansion area of the Capitol Zoning District, to be designated by the Governor, and who shall serve a three-year term; and

(6)

One (1) resident elector of this state who shall be an owner of property or the designee of an owner of property within the State Capitol area of the Capitol Zoning District, to be designated by the Governor, and who shall serve a three-year term.

(c)

The Director of the Capitol Zoning District Commission shall serve as the disbursing officer for the commission.

(d)

Members of the commission shall receive no pay for their services, but may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq.

(e)(1)

The commission is authorized to employ a director in consultation with the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism and within legislative appropriation.

(2)

The commission shall have the authority to enter into contracts of any lawful nature, and to do any and all acts necessary to effect the purposes of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 267, § 1; 1979, No. 917, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-235; Acts 1989, No. 787, § 1; 1993, No. 1223, § 5; 1993, No. 1265, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 215; 1997, No. 262, § 1; 1997, No. 1350, § 37; 1999, No. 1508, § 7; 2019, No. 910, § 5680.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment repealed the version of this section as amended by Acts 1997, No. 262.

The 2019 amendment substituted “in consultation with the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “and such other staff as the commission deems appropriate” in (e)(1).

22-3-304. Zoning authority of Capitol Zoning District Commission.

The Capitol Zoning District Commission is authorized broad scope in its zoning authority to include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1)

Restrictions on the height, number of stories, and size of buildings;

(2)

Percentage of lots that may be occupied;

(3)

Use of structures and land;

(4)

Population density;

(5)

Amount of open space;

(6)

Parking areas; and

(7)

Restriction of noisy and polluting processes or those endangering the health and safety of the citizens of the zoning district.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 267, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-242.

22-3-305. Master plan.

(a)

The Capitol Zoning District Commission, using professional and technical assistance as it deems necessary, shall make, adopt, maintain, and revise, from time to time, an official master comprehensive plan for the Capitol Zoning District for the purpose of bringing about coordinated physical development in accordance with the present and future needs of the district.

(b)

The master plan will be developed so as to preserve the dignity of the Capitol Building and Governor's Mansion, ensure efficient expenditure of public funds, and promote the safety, convenience, and general well-being of the district's inhabitants and property owners.

(c)

The master plan should include, among other things, rules relative to the location and character of roads and other transportation routes, utility services, parks, buildings, and other construction within the district.

(d)

The commission may adopt the plan in whole or in part and may subsequently amend the adopted plan in whole or in part.

(e)

After the adoption of the master comprehensive plan, the commission shall file a copy with the office of the Secretary of State for the inspection of the public.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 267, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-237; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2347.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

22-3-306. Authority of Capitol Zoning District Commission over property within Capitol Zoning District — Permits.

(a)

After the adoption of the comprehensive master zoning plan, the Capitol Zoning District Commission shall have exclusive authority over the zoning and regulation of the utilization of all property within the Capitol Zoning District, and no planning or zoning authority or jurisdiction of any subdivision of the state shall have any zoning or control authority except as agreed upon by the commission.

(b)(1)

After the adoption by the commission of the comprehensive master zoning plan, the commission shall have the authority to approve or disapprove the location and design of any improvements to be placed upon any land within the district, and no improvements shall be placed upon any land within the district unless the design and proposed location shall be approved by the commission.

(2)

Such improvements shall include, but not be limited to, buildings, including additions and alterations, parking lots and facilities, and all other construction whatsoever, except that the word “improvements” shall not include existing streets, alleys, or utilities and shall not include maintenance, service, or improvement thereof.

(c)

After the adoption by the commission of the comprehensive master zoning plan, no improvement of any nature nor any change of land use shall commence within the district without a permit issued by the commission.

(d)

Within the district, a legally existing use, building, or structure that exists at the time of the adoption of the plans and rules authorized by this subchapter, but not in conformity with such plans and rules, may be continued but shall not be extended or structurally altered without the approval of the commission.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 267, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-239; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2348.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d) twice.

22-3-307. Adoption of rules by Capitol Zoning District Commission.

(a)

The Capitol Zoning District Commission shall have the power and authority to prescribe such rules concerning procedure before it and concerning the exercise of its functions and duties as it shall deem proper.

(b)

Prior to the adoption of any zoning rules or amendments thereto, the commission shall hold a public hearing thereon pursuant to the rules of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 267, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-239; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2349.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the section heading and in (a); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b) twice.

22-3-308. Coordination by Capitol Zoning District Commission with other agencies.

(a)

The Capitol Zoning District Commission is authorized and encouraged to coordinate the comprehensive master zoning plan, to the greatest extent it deems practical, with city, county, and other area planning agencies.

(b)(1)

Subject to the requirements of due process and consistent with any applicable federal restrictions and regulations as in effect on January 1, 2013, the commission may enter into agreements with the City of Little Rock providing for mutual cooperation and joint regulation within the Capitol Zoning District with respect to:

(A)

Planning and zoning;

(B)

Permission to build upon or otherwise use land;

(C)

Enforcement through stop work orders, citations, fines, and inspection to ensure compliance of building, safety, zoning, and health codes; and

(D)

Other matters within the jurisdiction of the commission.

(2)(A)

Except to the extent enforcement by the City of Little Rock is authorized in this section, an agreement under subdivision (b)(1) of this section between the City of Little Rock and the commission does not cede the commission's final authority and responsibility over the matters entrusted to it by law.

(B)

All enforcement actions undertaken by the City of Little Rock under this section shall require authorization by the commission prior to the commencement of the enforcement action.

(3)(A)

A violation of the commission's rules is enforceable in Little Rock District Court in the same manner as the enforcement of a violation of a municipal ordinance.

(B)

Subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section applies only to violations that occur on or after August 16, 2013, and does not apply to work in place prior to August 16, 2013.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 267, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-238; Acts 2011, No. 520, § 1; 2013, No. 1338, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2350.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment, in (b)(1), inserted “Subject to the requirements of due process and consistent with any applicable federal restrictions and regulations as in effect on January 1, 2011, the” at the beginning, “through stop work orders, citations, fines, and inspection to ensure compliance,” and “zoning,” and deleted “and inspection to ensure compliance therewith” following “health codes”; and substituted “An agreement under subdivision (b)(1) of this section”
for “Such agreements” in (b)(2).

The 2013 amendment, in (b)(1), substituted “2013” for “2011” and added (A) through (D) subdivision designations; added (2)(A) designation; inserted “Except to the extent enforcement by the City of Little Rock is authorized in this section” in (2)(A); and added (2)(B) and (3).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(3)(A).

22-3-309. Capitol Zoning District Commission's power to institute and defend legal actions.

(a)

The Capitol Zoning District Commission shall constitute a body corporate for purposes of instituting and defending litigation to enforce its rules, decisions, and orders; and it may, in its name, institute or defend actions in its own behalf, or in behalf of the owner or owners of any property within the district, to enjoin any breach or violation thereof.

(b)

No bond shall be required of the Capitol Zoning District Commission in any action for the issuance of any temporary or permanent order, or on an appeal.

(c)

The Attorney General shall be the legal adviser to the Capitol Zoning District Commission in the same capacity as he or she is to other boards and commissions.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 267, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-240; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2351.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (a).

22-3-310. Appeal of Capitol Zoning District Commission action.

(a)(1)(A)

Any person aggrieved by any rule, decision, or order of the Capitol Zoning District Commission may appeal the action to the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

(B)

The secretary shall overturn the decision of the commission upon a finding that the commission's decision is clearly erroneous.

(2)(A)

The decision of the secretary may be appealed to the Pulaski County Circuit Court.

(B)

The commission and the secretary shall provide the Pulaski County Circuit Court with a record of all proceedings concerning the action on appeal.

(C)

The Pulaski County Circuit Court shall review the appeal of the secretary's decision de novo.

(b)

The filing of an appeal shall in no respect suspend the operation of any rule, decision, or order, nor shall the secretary or the Pulaski County Circuit Court order any suspension without a full hearing.

(c)

This section does not preclude enforcement of the commission's rules by the City of Little Rock in Little Rock District Court under an agreement with the commission under §22-3-308.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 267, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-241; Acts 2013, No. 1338, § 2; 2016, No. 228, § 4; 2019, No. 315, §§ 2352, 2353; 2019, No. 910, § 5681.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (c).

The 2016 amendment rewrote (a); and inserted “director or the” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a)(1)(A) and (b); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (a)(1)(A).

22-3-311. Report by Capitol Zoning District Commission to Legislative Council.

The Capitol Zoning District Commission shall submit a written summary of its actions and progress to the Legislative Council as requested by the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 267, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-243.

22-3-312. Sale of property within Capitol Zoning District — Notice.

(a)

A person who sells real property within the Capitol Zoning District shall notify the purchaser that the real property is within the district and shall provide the purchaser with a summary of the Capital Zoning District Commission's restrictions on property in the district and the duties and responsibilities of owners of property in the district.

(b)

The summary required by this section shall be prepared by the commission.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1265, § 2.

22-3-313. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning transfer of powers to the Capitol Zoning District Commission, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6183, effective July 1, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1997, No. 1350, § 35.

Subchapter 4

— Capitol Parking Control

Effective Dates.

Acts 1989, No. 468, § 7: Mar. 10, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under the present laws protection of the State Capitol grounds is inadequate; that this act is designed to maintain proper order and decorum, prevent unlawful assemblies, exclude and eject persons detrimental to the well-being of the State Capitol grounds and regulate the operation and parking of motor vehicles in the Capitol Zoning District and that this law should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 153: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Building Authority, the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, the Department of Rural Services, and the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department are inefficiently structured; that this inefficient structuring causes an excessive and unnecessary cost to the taxpayers of the this state; and that this act is essential to alleviating that financial burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-3-401. Purpose.

(a)

The purpose of this subchapter is to establish a system of traffic control and parking rules governing the drives and parking areas on the State Capitol grounds and other drives and parking areas in the custody of or leased by the Secretary of State or the Building Authority Division.

(b)

In enacting this subchapter, the General Assembly is cognizant of the fact that increased traffic and crowded parking conditions on the State Capitol grounds make it imperative that a system of traffic and parking control be established in order that it might be more convenient for the public to have access to the agencies of government located on the State Capitol grounds and to other buildings in the custody of or leased by the Secretary of State or the division.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 721, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-249; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2354; 2019, No. 910, § 6184.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a).

22-3-402. Definition.

As used in this subchapter, the term “State Capitol grounds” means all property owned by the State of Arkansas within the Capitol Zoning District as defined in §22-3-302.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 721, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-250.

22-3-403. Penalty.

(a)

Any person, including an employee of the State of Arkansas, found guilty of violating the provisions of this subchapter or the traffic and parking rules of the Capitol Parking Control Committee shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined in an amount of not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

(b)

All fines which may be collected on account of violation of this subchapter shall be paid into the State Treasury and placed to the credit of the State Capitol Police.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 721, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-255; Acts 1989, No. 468, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 2355.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a).

22-3-404. Enforcement.

(a)

In order that the provisions of this subchapter might be enforced, the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may assign one (1) state police officer or more to the State Capitol and its grounds, which may include assignments for sessions of the General Assembly, and the Secretary of State is directed to assign one (1) State Capitol Police officer or more. It shall be the responsibility of the Secretary of State to assure that at least one (1) certified law enforcement officer is on duty on the State Capitol grounds twenty-four (24) hours per day, seven (7) days per week.

(b)

Each State Capitol Police officer so assigned is authorized to issue, upon determining a violation, a uniform traffic citation that shall be returnable in the Pulaski County District Court.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 721, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-254; Acts 1989, No. 468, § 3; 2001, No. 1697, § 19; 2019, No. 910, § 6024.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a).

22-3-405. Capitol Parking Control Committee — Creation — Members — Meetings.

(a)

There is created a committee to be known as the “Capitol Parking Control Committee”, hereinafter referred to as “the committee”, which shall have the powers and duties provided in §22-3-406.

(b)

The committee shall be composed of three (3) members, as follows:

(1)

The Secretary of State or a designee;

(2)

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services or his or her designee; and

(3)

A state employee designated by the Secretary of State who is employed on the State Capitol grounds in a position of administrator or higher by an agency or office other than that of the Secretary of State or of the Building Authority Division.

(c)

The Secretary of State shall be the chair of the committee, and the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services or his or her designee shall serve as secretary of the committee.

(d)

Members of the committee shall serve without additional pay or compensation.

(e)

Meetings of the committee shall be held at such times and places as shall be directed by the chair or upon the petition of two (2) members of the committee.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 721, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-251; Acts 2003, No. 364, § 14; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 39; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 39; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6185, 6186.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment inserted “or a designee” in (b)(1); substituted “Arkansas Building Authority or a designee” for “State Building Services” in (b)(2); and substituted “authority” for “State Building Services” in (b)(3).

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Department of Finance and Administration or his or her” for "Arkansas Building Authority or a" in (b)(2); substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “authority” in (b)(2); and substituted “Department of Finance and Administration or his or her designee” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b)(2) and (c); deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (b)(3); and added “of the committee” at the end of (c).

22-3-406. Capitol Parking Control Committee — Powers and duties.

Upon the passage of this subchapter, the Capitol Parking Control Committee shall proceed to study the traffic conditions on the drives of the State Capitol grounds and shall make a study of the existing and anticipated needs for parking space on the State Capitol grounds and other parking lots and drives leased by or in the custody of the Secretary of State or the Building Authority Division. Upon completion of the study, the committee shall establish rules and shall amend or change them from time to time as deemed necessary in the following manner:

(1)

Establish maximum speed limits for motor vehicles traveling upon the regulated streets and drives;

(2)

Direct the flow of traffic on the regulated streets and drives;

(3)

Prohibit the parking, during normal business hours, of motor vehicles on the regulated streets and drives;

(4)

Establish or assign parking spaces that shall be available for use as designated by the various offices or persons working in the State Capitol Building or in any of the other buildings on the State Capitol grounds and regulate parking by elected officials in the spaces set aside for that purpose; and

(5)

Do all other things reasonable and necessary to properly regulate and control the flow of traffic on the State Capitol grounds and to provide parking facilities for use by the public on the grounds.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 721, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-252; Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 40; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 40; 2019, No. 315, § 2356; 2019, No. 910, § 6187.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “passage of this subchapter,” Acts 1983, No. 721, was signed by the Governor on March 23, 1983, and took effect on July 4, 1983.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in the introductory language.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the second sentence of the introductory language.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in the first sentence of the introductory language.

22-3-407. Additional parking areas.

(a)

In order to provide additional parking facilities on the State Capitol grounds, the Capitol Parking Control Committee is authorized and directed to study the needs for additional parking space and shall designate one (1) or more areas to be developed as appropriate parking areas.

(b)

Additional parking areas shall be of sufficient size to accommodate a minimum of forty (40) motor vehicles and shall be of such larger size as the committee may deem necessary for adequate parking on the State Capitol grounds.

(c)

Upon designating an area to be developed as a parking area on the State Capitol grounds, the committee shall certify the area designation to the State Highway Commission.

(d)

Upon receiving the certification, the commission shall proceed to prepare necessary plans and specifications for the parking area and shall let a contract for the work and pay for the work out of the Arkansas Department of Transportation construction funds or shall perform the work out of the department maintenance appropriation.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 721, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-256; Acts 2017, No. 707, §
80.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (d).